District of Columbia statutes.
7-702.05

Complaint investigation.

(a)

The ombudsman and his or her designee shall have access to any record that is necessary to carry out his or her responsibilities under this chapter.

(b)

The ombudsman or his or her designee may initiate an investigation of a long-term care facility independent of the receipt of a specific complaint.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-218, § 205, 36 DCR 534

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-3515.